test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-sajos_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - sajos: # 2A - ok
    sajos+N+Sg+Nom: saˊjos
    sajos+N+Sg+Gen: saijoos
    sajos+N+Sg+Acc: saijoos
    sajos+N+Sg+Ill: saˊj̣osân
    sajos+N+Sg+Loc: saˊj̣osist
    sajos+N+Sg+Com: saˊj̣osáin
    sajos+N+Sg+Abe: saijoosttáá
    sajos+N+Ess: saˊj̣osin
    sajos+N+Par: saˊj̣osid
    sajos+N+Pl+Nom: saˊj̣oseh
    sajos+N+Pl+Gen: saˊj̣osij
    sajos+N+Pl+Acc: saˊj̣̣osijd
    sajos+N+Pl+Ill: saˊj̣osáid
    sajos+N+Pl+Loc: saˊj̣osijn
    sajos+N+Pl+Com: saˊj̣osijgijn
    sajos+N+Pl+Abe: saˊj̣osijttáá
